California, session 20252026, SB165.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1324.29 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1324.29. (a) The quality assurance fee shall cease to be assessed after December 31, 2027.(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 1324.30, the department’s authority and obligation to collect all quality assurance fees and penalties, including interest, shall continue in effect and shall not cease until the date that all amounts are paid or recovered in full.(c) This section shall remain operative until the date that all fees and penalties, including interest, have been recovered pursuant to subdivision (b), and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 1324.30 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1324.30. This article shall become inoperative after December 31, 2027, except that the department shall be authorized to conduct all necessary closeout activities after this date and to continue implementing this article for any rate period before December 31, 2027, and as of January 1, 2029, this article is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 14126.033 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14126.033. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Costs within the Medi-Cal program continue to grow due to the rising cost of providing health care throughout the state and also due to increases in enrollment, which are more pronounced during difficult economic times.(2) In order to minimize the need for drastically cutting enrollment standards or benefits during times of economic crisis, it is crucial to find areas within the program where reimbursement levels are higher than required under the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and can be reduced in accordance with federal law.(3) The Medi-Cal program delivers its services and benefits to Medi-Cal beneficiaries through a wide variety of health care providers, under multiple delivery systems, including managed care, other contract models, or fee-for-service arrangements.(4) The setting of rates within the Medi-Cal program is complex and is subject to close supervision by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.(5) As the single state agency for the Medicaid program in California, the State Department of Health Care Services has unique expertise that can inform decisions that set or adjust reimbursement methodologies and levels consistent with the requirements of federal law.(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature for the department to analyze and identify where reimbursement levels can be reduced consistent with the standard provided in Section 1902(a)(30)(A) of the federal Social Security Act and federal and state law and policies, including any exemptions contained in the act that added this section, provided that the reductions in reimbursement shall not exceed 10 percent on an aggregate basis for all providers, services, and products.(c) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, this article shall be funded as follows:(1) General Fund moneys appropriated for purposes of this article pursuant to Section 6 of the act adding this section shall be used for increasing rates, except as provided in Section 14126.031, for freestanding skilled nursing facilities, and shall be consistent with the approved methodology required to be submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) (A) Notwithstanding Section 14126.023, for the 2005–06 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 8 percent of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the 2004–05 rate year as adjusted for the change in the cost to the facility to comply with the nursing facility quality assurance fee for the 2005–06 rate year, as required under subdivision (b) of Section 1324.21 of the Health and Safety Code, plus the total projected Medi-Cal cost to the facility of complying with new state or federal mandates.(B) Beginning with the 2006–07 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 5 percent of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the prior fiscal year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(C) Beginning with the 2007–08 rate year and continuing through the 2008–09 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not exceed 5.5 percent of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the prior fiscal year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(D) For the 2009–10 rate year, the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for purposes of this article shall not be increased with respect to the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the 2008–09 rate year, as adjusted for the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(3) (A) For the 2010–11 rate year, if the increase in the federal medical assistance percentage (FMAP) pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA) (Public Law 111-5) is extended for the entire 2010–11 rate year, the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purposes of this article shall not exceed 3.93 percent, or 3.14 percent, if the increase in the FMAP pursuant to ARRA is not extended for that period of time, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates. If the increase in the FMAP pursuant to ARRA is extended at a different rate, or for a different time period, the rate adjustment for facilities shall be adjusted accordingly.(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for the following reasons:(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality assurance fee.(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.(iii) To ensure that the state does not incur any additional General Fund expenses to pay for the 2010–11 weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase.(C) If the maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal rate is reduced pursuant to subparagraph (B), the department shall recalculate and publish the final maximum annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate.(4) (A) Subject to the following provisions, for the 2011–12 rate year, the increase in the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purpose of this article, for each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not exceed 2.4 percent of the rate on file that was applicable on May 31, 2011, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates. The percentage increase shall be applied equally to each rate on file as of May 31, 2011.(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for the following reasons:(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality assurance fee.(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.(iii) To ensure that the state does not incur any additional General Fund expenses to pay for the 2011–12 weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase.(C) The department may recalculate and publish the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase for the 2011–12 rate year if the difference in the projected quality assurance fee collections from the 2011–12 rate year, compared to the projected quality assurance fee collections for the 2010–11 rate year, would result in any additional General Fund expense to pay for the 2011–12 rate year weighted average reimbursement rate increase.(5) To the extent that rates are projected to exceed the adjusted limits calculated pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (2) and, as applicable, paragraphs (3) and (4), the department shall adjust each skilled nursing facility’s projected rate for the applicable rate year by an equal percentage.(6) (A) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subparagraph (B), payments resulting from the application of paragraphs (3) and (4), the provisions of paragraph (5), and all other applicable adjustments and limits as required by this section, shall be reduced by 10 percent for dates of service on and after June 1, 2011, through July 31, 2012. This one-time reduction shall be evenly distributed across all facilities to ensure long-term stability of nursing homes serving the Medi-Cal population.(ii) Notwithstanding any other law, the director may adjust the percentage reductions specified in clause (i), as long as the resulting reductions, in the aggregate, total no more than 10 percent.(iii) The adjustments authorized under this subparagraph shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments resulting from the adjustments comply with paragraph (7).(B) Payments to facilities owned or operated by the state shall be exempt from the payment reduction required by this paragraph.(7) (A) Notwithstanding this section, the payment reductions and adjustments required by paragraph (6) shall be implemented only if the director determines that the payments that result from the application of paragraph (6) shall comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements and that federal financial participation will be available.(B) In determining whether federal financial participation is available, the director shall determine whether the payments comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements, including those set forth in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.(C) To the extent that the director determines that the payments do not comply with applicable federal Medicaid requirements or that federal financial participation is unavailable with respect to any payment that is reduced pursuant to this section, the director retains the discretion to not implement the particular payment reduction or adjustment and may adjust the payment as necessary to comply with federal Medicaid requirements.(8) For managed care health plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except for contracts with the Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, and to the extent that these services are provided through any of those contracts, payments shall be reduced by the actuarial equivalent amount of the reduced provider reimbursements specified in paragraph (6) pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2011, or thereafter.(9) (A) For the 2012–13 rate year, all of the following shall apply:(i) The department shall determine the amounts of reduced payments for each skilled nursing facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, resulting from the 10-percent reduction imposed pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) for the period beginning on June 1, 2011, through July 31, 2012.(ii) For claims adjudicated through October 1, 2012, each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code that is reimbursed under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program, shall receive the total payments calculated by the department in clause (i), not later than December 31, 2012.(iii) For managed care plans that contract with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), except contracts with Senior Care Action Network and AIDS Healthcare Foundation, and to the extent that skilled nursing services are provided through any of those contracts, payments shall be adjusted by the actuarial equivalent amount of the reimbursements calculated in clause (i) pursuant to contract amendments or change orders effective on July 1, 2012, or thereafter.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), beginning on August 1, 2012, through July 31, 2013, the department shall pay the facility specific Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that was on file and applicable to the specific skilled nursing facility on August 1, 2011, prior to and excluding any rate reduction implemented pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (6) for the period beginning on June 1, 2011, to July 31, 2012, inclusive, and adjusted for the projected costs of complying with new state or federal mandates. These rates are deemed to be sufficient to meet operating expenses.(C) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (B) shall be adjusted by the department if the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the skilled nursing quality assurance fee pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.(D) Notwithstanding any other law, beginning on January 1, 2013, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, which imposes a skilled nursing facility quality assurance fee, shall be unenforceable against any skilled nursing facility unless each skilled nursing facility is paid the rate provided for in subparagraphs (A) and (B). Any amount collected during the 2012–13 rate year by the department pursuant to Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be refunded to each facility not later than February 1, 2013.(E) The provisions of this paragraph shall also be included as part of a state plan amendment implementing the 2011–12 and 2012–13 Medi-Cal reimbursement rates authorized under this article.(10) (A) Subject to the following provisions, for the 2013–14 and 2014–15 rate years, the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for the purpose of this article, for each skilled nursing facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be 3 percent for each rate year, respectively, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(B) (i) For the 2013–14 rate year, if there is a rate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, the department shall set aside 1 percent of the increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, from which the department shall transfer the nonfederal portion into the Skilled Nursing Facility Quality and Accountability Special Fund, to be used for the supplemental rate pool.(ii) For the 2014–15 rate year, if there is a rate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, the department shall set aside at least one-third of the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase, up to a maximum of 1 percent, from which the department shall transfer the nonfederal portion of this amount into the Skilled Nursing Facility Quality and Accountability Special Fund.(C) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted by the department for the following reasons:(i) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve exemption changes to the facilities subject to the quality assurance fee.(ii) If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not approve any proposed modification to the methodology for calculation of the quality assurance fee.(11) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals for the implementation of this section. This section shall not be implemented until federal approval is obtained. When federal approval is obtained, the payments resulting from the application of paragraph (6) shall be implemented retroactively to June 1, 2011, or on any other date or dates as may be applicable.(12) (A) (i) Beginning with the 2015–16 rate year, and through the conclusion of the rate period from August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate, required for the purposes of this article, shall be 3.62 percent, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(ii) The reimbursement rates established for the rate period of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, shall be no less than the amounts that would have been established under the reimbursement methodology pursuant to this section for the 2019–20 rate year, subject to subparagraph (B).(B) The weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the rate period of August 1, 2020, to December 31, 2020, inclusive, upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” means the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of that declaration.(13) (A) For the 2021 calendar year, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that is required for the purposes of this article shall be 3.5 percent plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the 2021 calendar year upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of that declaration.(14) (A) For the 2022 calendar year, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that is required for the purposes of this article shall be 2.4 percent plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the 2022 calendar year upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of such declaration.(15) (A) For the 2022 and 2023 calendar years, inclusive, the reimbursement rate established for a skilled nursing facility pursuant to this section shall continue to be increased by the temporary Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency in effect for that facility on July 31, 2020, or an amount equivalent to those temporary increased Medicaid payments should the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency expire prior to December 31, 2023.(B) For the 2023 calendar year, 85 percent of the amount of temporary Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, or amounts equivalent to those temporary increased Medicaid payments should the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency expire prior to December 31, 2023, received by a facility shall be spent on additional labor costs, including, but not limited to, increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, and overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers. Such increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers or other additional labor costs shall qualify for this purpose if they were either of the following:(i) Implemented prior to January 1, 2023, and continued during the 2023 calendar year.(ii) Implemented on or after January 1, 2023.(C) If the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency is renewed past December 31, 2023, the temporary Medicaid payments for skilled nursing facilities associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, as authorized in the Medi-Cal State Plan, shall cease on December 31, 2023, subject to subdivision (h).(D) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of such declaration.(16) (A) For the 2023 calendar year, the maximum annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:(i) For the labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase shall be 5 percent.(ii) For each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase shall be 2 percent.(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increases specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(17) (A) Beginning in the 2024 calendar year, the department shall establish a workforce adjustment, as further described in paragraphs (18), (19) and (20), for a skilled nursing facility that meets workforce standards, as determined by the department in consultation with representatives from the long-term care industry, organized labor, and consumer advocates.(B) The workforce standards may include, but need not be limited to, criteria such as maintaining a collective bargaining agreement or comparable, legally binding, written commitment with its direct and indirect care staff, payment of a prevailing wage for its direct and indirect care staff, payment of an average salary above minimum wage, participation in a statewide, multiemployer joint labor-management committee of skilled nursing facility employers and workers, or other factors, as determined by the department in consultation with the stakeholders listed above. The criteria may vary for facilities based on facility demographics or other factors such as facility size, location or other factor, as determined by the department in consultation with the stakeholders listed above.(18) (A) For the 2024 calendar year, the maximum annual increase in the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:(i) For the labor cost category specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual increase shall be determined as follows:(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the annual increase for the facility shall not have a percentage growth limit applied to the facility’s audited costs within the labor cost category trended to the 2024 calendar year.(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17), an annual increase of up to 5 percent shall be applied to the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate based on audited cost reports trended to the calendar 2024 year.(ii) For the 2024 calendar year, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those categories shall be 1 percent. Additionally, for the 2024 calendar year, an amount equivalent to the annual aggregate increase of 1 percent calculated pursuant to this clause, as determined by the department, shall be used to supplement the funds available for payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14126.024.(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(19) (A) For the 2025 calendar year, the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:(i) The rate for the labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023 shall be determined as follows:(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the facility’s audited costs for the labor cost category that would have been used for calculating the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate had the facility met the criteria described in paragraph (17) in the 2024 calendar year increased by up to 5 percent for the 2025 calendar year based on audited cost reports trended to the 2025 calendar year.(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2024 and 2025 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.(ii) For the 2025 calendar year, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the facility’s rate for those categories shall equal the reimbursement included in the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate for those categories increased by an aggregate of 1 percent in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those categories. Additionally, for the 2025 calendar year, an amount equivalent to the annual aggregate increase of 1 percent calculated pursuant to this clause, as determined by the department, shall be used to supplement the funds available for payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14126.024.(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(20) (A) For the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:(i) The rate for labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023 shall be determined as follows:(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the facility’s audited costs within the labor cost category that would have been used for calculating the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate had the facility met the criteria in the 2024 calendar year increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2025, 2026, and 2027 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2024, 2025, 2026, and 2027 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.(ii) For the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the facility’s rate for those categories shall equal the reimbursement included in the facility’s 2025 calendar year rate for those categories increased by an aggregate of 1 percent in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those categories.(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.(d) (1) The department may modify any methodology or other provision specified in this article to the extent it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized, provided the modification does not violate the spirit, purposes, and intent of this article.(2) If the department determines that a modification is necessary pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consult with affected providers and stakeholders to the extent practicable.(3) In the event of a modification made pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall notify affected providers, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within 10 business days of the modification.(e) The rate methodology shall cease to be implemented after December 31, 2027.(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the implementation of this article result in individual access to appropriate long-term care services, quality resident care, decent wages and benefits for nursing home workers, a stable workforce, provider compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements, and administrative efficiency.(2) Not later than December 1, 2006, the California State Auditor’s Office shall conduct an accountability evaluation of the department’s progress toward implementing a facility-specific reimbursement system, including a review of data to ensure that the new system is appropriately reimbursing facilities within specified cost categories and a review of the fiscal impact of the new system on the General Fund.(3) Not later than January 1, 2007, to the extent information is available for the three years immediately preceding the implementation of this article, the department shall provide baseline information in a report to the Legislature on all of the following:(A) The number and percent of freestanding skilled nursing facilities that complied with minimum staffing requirements.(B) The staffing levels before the implementation of this article.(C) The staffing retention rates before the implementation of this article.(D) The numbers and percentage of freestanding skilled nursing facilities with findings of immediate jeopardy, substandard quality of care, or actual harm, as determined by the certification survey of each freestanding skilled nursing facility conducted before the implementation of this article.(E) The number of freestanding skilled nursing facilities that received state citations and the number and class of citations issued during calendar year 2004.(F) The average wage and benefits for employees before the implementation of this article.(4) Not later than January 1, 2009, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature that does both of the following:(A) Compares the information required in paragraph (2) to that same information two years after the implementation of this article.(B) Reports on the extent to which residents who had expressed a preference to return to the community, as provided in Section 1418.81 of the Health and Safety Code, were able to return to the community.(5) The department may contract for the reports required under this subdivision.(g) (1) Beginning with the 2021 calendar year, and continuing each calendar year thereafter, a skilled nursing facility shall demonstrate its compliance with the following Medi-Cal funded requirements upon request by, and in the form and manner specified by, the department:(A) Direct care service hours per patient day requirements pursuant to Section 1276.65 of the Health and Safety Code and as enforced pursuant to Section 14126.022.(B) Applicable minimum wage laws.(C) Wage passthrough requirements pursuant to Section 14110.6 of this code and Section 1338 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) If the department determines that a skilled nursing facility has not demonstrated satisfactory compliance pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1), in consultation with State Department of Public Health or other applicable state agencies and departments if necessary, the department shall assess a monthly penalty up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for that skilled nursing facility, except as provided in paragraph (3), until the facility demonstrates its compliance to the department. The penalty amounts assessed pursuant to this subdivision in any one calendar year shall be limited to 4 percent of the total Medi-Cal revenue received by the skilled nursing facility in the previous calendar year. If the department determines a facility is out of compliance for multiple calendar years, additional penalty amounts may be assessed for each respective calendar year.(3) The department may waive a portion or all of the penalties assessed pursuant to this subdivision with respect to a petitioning skilled nursing facility in the event the department determines, in its sole discretion, that the facility has demonstrated that imposing the full penalty has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for the facility or creates a significant financial difficulty in providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.(h) In implementing this article, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This article shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.SEC. 4. Section 14126.036 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14126.036. (a) This article shall become inoperative after December 31, 2027, except that the department shall be authorized to conduct all necessary closeout activities after this date and to continue implementing this article for any rate period before December 31, 2027.(b) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2029, or on the date that the director certifies to the Secretary of State that all necessary closeout activities have been completed pursuant to subdivision (a), whichever is later.SEC. 5. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to extend and maintain the financing and reimbursement structures that support the state’s skilled nursing facilities and ensure continued access to long-term care for seniors and persons with disabilities, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.